Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-19] Testimony by department social
worker. A person employed by the department as a social worker in the area
of child protective services or child welfare services shall be presumed to be
qualified to testify as an expert on child protective or child welfare
services. Any party may move the court to qualify a person employed by the
department as a social worker in the area of child protective services or child
welfare services called to testify as an expert on child protective or child
welfare services. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next